Vermont, session 2025-2026, H343.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 2606 is amended to read:
§ 2606. ACCEPTANCE OF GIFTS; EXCHANGE, PURCHASE, OR LEASE
OF LANDS
VT LEG #380853 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.343
2025 Page 2 of 5
(a) The Commissioner, with the approval of the Governor, may accept gifts
of land or interests in land to the State, or may purchase land or interests in
land in the name of the State to be held and administered as State forests, State
parks, easement interests, agricultural land for use by certified citizens of
State-recognized Native American Indian tribes, or as interests supporting the
management and use of such lands and interests.
(b) Notwithstanding 29 V.S.A. § 166, with the approval of the General
Assembly, which may be granted by resolution, the Commissioner may sell,
convey, exchange, or lease lands, or interests in land, or may amend deeds,
leases, and easement interests, under his or her the Commissioner’s jurisdiction
when in his or her the Commissioner’s judgment it is advantageous to the State
to do so in the highest orderly development and management of State forests,
State parks, or other interests in land.
(c) The Commissioner, with the approval of the Governor, may lease mine,
quarry, or other resource sites or rights as may be discovered on State forest or
State park lands unconditionally owned by the State.
(d) The Commissioner, with the approval of the Governor, may lease for a
term of years, or otherwise, such lands as he or she the Commissioner deems
necessary for the protection of State forest or State park lands or for use by the
State in connection therewith.
VT LEG #380853 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.343
2025 Page 3 of 5
(e) The provisions of this section shall not be construed to allow the
Commissioner to grant oil and gas leases.
(f) As used in this section, “agricultural land” means land used for farming,
as “farming” is defined in section 2.16 of the Required Agricultural Practices.
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. § 2606c is added to read:
§ 2606c. LEASE OF STATE LANDS FOR FARMING
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Farming” has the same meaning as in section 2.16 of the Required
Agricultural Practices.
(2) “State land” means land owned or controlled by the Agency of
Natural Resources.
(3) “State-recognized Native American Indian tribes” means a tribe that
has been recognized by the State pursuant to 1 V.S.A. chapter 23.
(b) It is hereby adopted as State policy to permit limited use of designated
State lands for farming by citizens of State-recognized Native American Indian
tribes.
(c) The Secretary of Natural Resources, after consultation with the
Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets, shall identify State lands that
would be suitable for farming without harvesting of timber, disturbance of
wildlife corridors, or other significant disturbance to land or wildlife. On or
before July 1, 2027, the Secretary of Natural Resources shall publish on the
VT LEG #380853 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.343
2025 Page 4 of 5
Agency of Natural Resources’ website an inventory of State land available to
be leased for farming.
(d)(1) The Secretary of Natural Resources shall issue leases to certified
citizens of a State-recognized Native American Indian tribe for the use of State
lands for farming.
(2) The Secretary of Natural Resources may issue criteria or guidelines
for farming on State lands, and each lease may include terms and conditions of
use as may be necessary to preserve the health and long-term use of the State
land. At a minimum, the Secretary of Natural Resources shall require any
person farming on State lands under this section to comply with the Required
Agricultural Practices, as adopted by the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and
Markets under 6 V.S.A. chapter 215.
(3) The Secretary of Natural Resources shall issue a lease under this
section for a fixed term not to exceed five years. The lease shall be renewable
for two five-year terms subsequent to the initial lessee. Subsequent renewals
shall be allowed where agreed upon by the Secretary of Natural Resources and
the lessee. The Secretary of Natural Resources shall have power to terminate
or modify a lease for cause, including violation of the Required Agricultural
Practices or damage to State lands from activities other than normal farming
practices.
VT LEG #380853 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.343
2025 Page 5 of 5
(e) The Secretary of Natural Resources shall establish by procedure an
application process for a lease under this section. The application process shall
include:
(1) a designated form or website for submission of an application;
(2) criteria for award of a lease, which may include an applicant’s
previous experience with farming or the type of farming proposed for a tract of
State lands; and
(3) any additional criteria that the Secretary of Natural Resources deems
necessary for processing of application or award of leases.
Sec. 3. SECRETARY OF NATURAL RESOURCES REPORT ON FEE FOR
LEASING OF STATE LAND FOR FARMING
On or before January 1, 2027, the Secretary of Natural Resources shall
submit to the House Committees on Agriculture, Food Resiliency, and
Forestry, on Environment, and on Ways and Means and the Senate Committees
on Agriculture, on Natural Resources and Energy, and on Finance a
recommended fee or fee structure for the leasing under 10 V.S.A. § 2606c of
State lands for farming by certified citizens of State-recognized Native
American Indian tribes.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380853 v.1